Tennessee, session 114, HB2050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-10-114(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(9) The funds may be used by an officeholder to procure home security
equipment, including hardware and software, and monitoring services for the
officeholder's personal residence.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2050
009475
- 1 -